New Jersey, session 221, A5146.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.11A:4-15 is amended to read as follows: 11A:4-15.  Working test period.  The purpose of the working test period is to permit an appointing authority to determine whether an employee satisfactorily performs the duties of a title.  A working test period is part of the examination process which shall be served in the title to which the certification was issued and appointment made.  The commission shall provide for: a.     A working test period following regular appointment of four months, which may be extended to six months at the discretion of the commission, except that [the working test period for political subdivision employees shall be three months and] the working test period for entry level law enforcement, correction officer, and firefighter titles shall be 12 months; b.    Progress reports to be made by the appointing authority and provided to the employee at such times during the working test period as provided by rules of the commission and a final progress report at the end of the entire working test period shall be provided to the employee and the commission; c.     Termination of an employee at the end of the working test period and termination of an employee for cause during the working test period; and d.    The retention of permanent status in the lower title by a promoted employee during the working test period in the higher title and the right to return to such permanent title if the employee does not satisfactorily complete the working test period, but employees removed for cause during a working test period shall not be so returned. (cf: P.L.2008, c.29, s.41) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, for most civil service employees, the Civil Service Commission provides for a working test period of four months, which may be extended to six months at the discretion of the commission, except that the working test period for political subdivision employees is three months.  This bill removes the exception for political subdivision employees.  Under the bill, the working test period for political subdivision employees will be four months and may be extended to six months at the discretion of the commission.